District of Columbia statutes.
24-1201

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Council” means the Council of the District of Columbia.

(2)

“Judiciary Square” means the area generally bounded by H Street, N.W. to the north, 6th Street, N.W. to the west, Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W. and Constitution Avenue, N.W. to the south, and 1st Street, N.W. and 3rd Street, N.W. to the east.

(3)

“Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

May 4, 1990, D.C. Law 8-117, § 2, 37 DCR 1733
1981 Ed., § 32-1701.